California statutes. Vehicle Code
If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the processing agency within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation together with the proof of a written lease or rental agreement between a bona fide rental or leasing company, and its customer which identifies the rentee or lessee and provides the driver’s license number, name, and address of the rentee or lessee, the processing agency shall serve or mail to the rentee or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability a notice of delinquent parking violation. If payment is not received within 21 calendar days from the date of issuance of the citation or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation, the processing agency may proceed against the rentee or lessee pursuant to Section 40220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1156, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40210.

(a) If the affidavit of nonliability is returned and indicates that the registered owner served has made a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle and has delivered possession of the vehicle to the purchaser prior to the date of the alleged violation, the processing agency shall obtain verification from the department that the registered owner has complied with Section 5602.

(b) If the registered owner has complied with Section 5602, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of delinquent parking violation or violations with respect to the registered owner.

(c) If the registered owner has not complied with Section 5602, the processing agency shall inform the registered owner that the citation shall be paid in full or contested pursuant to Section 40215 unless the registered owner delivers evidence within 15 days of the notice that establishes that the transfer of ownership and possession of the vehicle occurred prior to the date of the alleged violation. If the registered owner does not comply with this notice, the processing agency shall proceed pursuant to Section 40220. If the registered owner delivers the evidence within 15 days of the notice, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of delinquent parking violation or violations with respect to the registered owner.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), evidence sufficient to establish that the transfer of ownership and possession occurred prior to the date of the alleged violation or violations shall include, but is not limited to, a copy of the executed agreement showing the date of the transfer of vehicle ownership.

(e) This section does not limit or impair the ability or the right of the processing agency to pursue the collection of delinquent parking penalties from the person having ownership and possession of the vehicle on the date the alleged violation occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40211.

(a) If the registered owner, or an agent of the registered owner, or a rentee or lessee who was served with the notice of delinquent parking violation pursuant to Section 40206 or Section 40209, or any other person who presents the notice of parking violation or notice of delinquent parking violation after the notice of delinquent parking violation has been issued for delivery under Section 40206, deposits the parking penalty with a person authorized to receive it, the processing agency shall do both of the following:

(1) Deliver a copy of one of the following: the notice of delinquent parking violation issued under Section 40206; a true and correct abstract containing the information set forth in the notice of parking violation if the citation was issued electronically; or an electronically reproduced listing of the citation information presented in a notice of delinquent parking violation to the person and record the name, address, and driver’s license number of the person actually given the copy in the records of the issuing agency.

For the purposes of this paragraph, a copy of the notice of delinquent parking violation may be a photostatic copy.

(2) Determine whether the notice of delinquent parking violation has been filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40220 or a civil judgment has been entered pursuant to Section 40220.

(b) If the notice of delinquent parking violation has not been filed with the department or judgment entered and payment of the parking penalty, including any applicable assessments, is received, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(c) If the notice of delinquent parking violation has been filed with the department, has been returned under subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 4760 or Section 4764, and payment of the parking penalty together with the administrative service fee of the processing agency for costs of service and any applicable assessments is received, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(d) If the notice of delinquent parking violation has been filed with the department and has not been returned under Section 4760, 4762, and 4764, and payment of the parking penalty for, and any applicable costs of, service in connection with civil debt collection, is received by the processing agency, the processing agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Deliver a certificate of payment to the registered owner, the agent, the lessee, or the rentee or other person making the payment.

(2) Immediately transmit the payment information to the department in the manner prescribed by the department.

(3) Terminate proceedings on the notice of delinquent parking violation.

(4) Transmit for deposit all parking penalties and assessments in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 734, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40215.

(a) For a period of 21 calendar days from the issuance of a notice of parking violation or 14 calendar days from the mailing of a notice of delinquent parking violation, exclusive of any days from the day the processing agency receives a request for a copy or facsimile of the original notice of parking violation pursuant to Section 40206.5 and the day the processing agency complies with the request, a person may request an initial review of the notice by the issuing agency. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. There shall not be a charge for this review. If, following the initial review, the issuing agency is satisfied that the violation did not occur, that the registered owner was not responsible for the violation, or that
 extenuating circumstances make dismissal of the citation appropriate in the
 interest of justice, the issuing agency shall cancel the notice of parking violation or notice of delinquent parking violation. The issuing agency shall advise the processing agency, if any, of the cancellation. The issuing agency or the processing agency shall mail the results of the initial review to the person contesting the notice, and, if following that review, cancellation of the notice does not occur, include a reason for that denial, notification of the ability to request an administrative hearing, and notice of the procedure adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) for waiving prepayment of the parking penalty based upon an inability to pay.

(b) If the person is dissatisfied with the results of the initial review, the person may request an administrative hearing of the violation no later than 21 calendar days following the
 mailing of the results of the issuing agency’s initial review. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. The person requesting an administrative hearing shall deposit the amount of the parking penalty with the processing agency. The issuing agency shall adopt a written procedure to allow a person who is indigent, as defined in Section 40220, to request an administrative hearing without payment of the parking penalty upon satisfactory proof of an inability to pay the amount due. An administrative hearing shall be held within 90 calendar days following the receipt of a request for an administrative hearing, excluding time tolled pursuant to this article. The person requesting the hearing may request one continuance, not to exceed 21 calendar days.

(c) The administrative hearing process shall include all of the following:

(1) The person requesting a hearing shall have the choice of a hearing by mail, in person, or, if offered by the issuing agency, by telephone or electronic means. An in-person hearing shall be conducted within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency. If an issuing agency contracts with an administrative provider, in-person hearings shall be held within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency or within the county of the issuing agency.

(2) If the person requesting a hearing is a minor, that person shall be permitted to appear at a hearing or admit responsibility for the parking violation without the necessity of the appointment of a guardian. The processing agency may proceed against the minor in the same manner as against an adult.

(3) The
 administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with written procedures established by the issuing agency and approved by the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency. The hearing shall provide an independent, objective, fair, and impartial review of contested parking violations.

(4) (A) The issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive officer shall appoint or contract with qualified examiners or administrative hearing providers that employ qualified examiners to conduct the administrative hearings. Examiners shall demonstrate those qualifications, training, and objectivity necessary to conduct a fair and impartial review. An examiner shall not be employed, managed, or controlled by a person whose primary duties are parking enforcement or parking citation, processing, collection, or
 issuance. The examiner shall be separate and independent from the citation, collection, or processing function. An examiner’s continued employment, performance evaluation, compensation, and benefits shall not, directly or indirectly, be linked to the amount of fines collected by the examiner.

(B) (i) Examiners shall have a minimum of 20 hours of training. The examiner is responsible for the costs of the training. The issuing agency may reimburse the examiner for those costs.

(ii) Training may be provided through any of the following:

(I) An accredited college or university.

(II) A program conducted by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards
 and Training.

(III) American Arbitration Association or a similar established organization.

(IV) Through a program approved by the governing board of the issuing agency, including a program developed and provided by, or for, the issuing agency.

(iii) Training programs may include topics relevant to the administrative hearing, including, but not limited to, applicable laws and regulations, parking enforcement procedures, due process, evaluation of evidence, hearing procedures, and effective oral and written communication.

(iv) Upon the approval of the governing board of the issuing agency, up to 12 hours of relevant experience may be substituted for up to 12
 hours of training. In addition, up to eight hours of the training requirements described in clause (i) may be credited to an individual, at the discretion of the governing board of the issuing agency, based upon training programs or courses described in clause (ii) that the individual attended within the last five years.

(5) The officer or person who issues a notice of parking violation shall not be required to participate in an administrative hearing. The issuing agency shall not be required to produce any evidence other than the notice of parking violation or copy of the notice and information received from the Department of Motor Vehicles identifying the registered owner of the vehicle. The documentation in proper form shall be prima facie evidence of the violation.

(6) The
 examiner’s decision following the administrative hearing may be personally delivered to the person by the examiner or sent by first-class mail, and, if the notice is not cancelled, include a written reason for that denial.

(7) The examiner or the issuing agency may, at any time, and consistent with the written guidelines established by the issuing agency, allow payment of the parking penalty in installments, or the issuing agency may allow for deferred payment or allow for a reduction or
 waiver of the parking penalty if the person provides evidence satisfactory to the examiner or the issuing agency, as the case may be, of either an inability to pay the parking penalty in full, or any other extenuating circumstances relevant to payment of the parking penalty, including, but not limited to, documented homelessness status and financial hardship. If authorized by the governing board of the issuing agency, the examiner may permit the performance of community service in lieu of payment of a parking penalty.

(d) The provisions of this section relating to the administrative appeal process do not apply to an issuing agency that is a law enforcement agency if the issuing agency does not also act as the processing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   (AB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

40220.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 40220.5, 40221, and 40222, the processing agency may proceed under one of the following options in order to collect an unpaid parking penalty and related service fees:

(1) (A) File an itemization of unpaid parking penalties and related service fees with the department for collection with the registration of the vehicle pursuant to Section 4760. For unpaid parking penalties issued on and after July 1, 2018, and related service fees, the processing agency shall not file an itemization with the department unless all of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(i) The processing agency provides a payment plan option for indigent
 persons that, at a minimum, does all of the following:

(I) Allows payment of unpaid parking penalties and related service fees in monthly installments of no more than twenty-five dollars ($25) for total amounts due that are five hundred dollars ($500) or less. The amount of late fees and penalty assessments waived pursuant to subclause (II) shall not be counted in calculating that total amount of five hundred dollars ($500) or less. Unpaid parking penalties and fees shall be paid off within 24 months. There shall be no prepayment penalty for paying off the balance prior to the payment period expiring.

(II) Waives all late fees and penalty assessments, exclusive of any state surcharges described in Sections 70372, 76000, and 76000.3 of the Government Code, if an indigent person enrolls in the payment plan. Waived late fees and penalty assessments may be reinstated if the person
 falls out of compliance with the payment plan.

(III) Limits the processing fee to participate in a payment plan to five dollars ($5) or less for indigent persons. The processing fee for an indigent person may be added to the payment plan amount, at the discretion of the indigent person. If a processing agency offers a payment plan option to persons who are not indigent, limits the processing fee to participate in the payment plan to twenty-five dollars ($25) or less.

(IV) Allows a person to file a request to participate in a payment
 plan at any time.

(ii) The processing agency includes the information described in subclauses (I) and (II) in the notice of parking violation, and includes both in the notice of parking violation and on its public internet website, a web page link and telephone number to more information on the payment program. Each processing agency shall ensure that the linked internet web page is readily accessible in a prominent location on the parking citation payment section of the agency’s internet website and includes all of the following information:

(I) The availability of an installment payment plan and the timeframe in which to apply.

(II) The person’s right to request an indigency determination and the timeframe in which the person must apply.

(III) Clear language about how the person can request an indigency determination and what that determination will entail.

(IV) Documents needed by the processing agency to make an indigency determination.

(iii) The person fails to enroll in the payment plan within the time specified in the notice or is not eligible for the payment plan because the person is not indigent.

(B) The processing agency shall allow a person who falls out of compliance with the payment plan a one-time extension of 45 calendar days from the date the payment plan becomes delinquent to resume payments before the processing agency files an itemization of unpaid parking penalties and related service fees with the department pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(C) The processing agency shall rescind the filing of an itemization of unpaid parking penalties and related service fees with the department for an indigent person, for one time only, if the registered owner or lessee enrolls in a payment plan and pays a late fee of no more than five dollars ($5).

(D) (i) Each California State University and community college district governing board shall adopt a parking citation payment plan for persons with multiple unpaid parking citations. A parking citation payment policy adopted under this subparagraph shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(I) Late fees shall be placed in abeyance while the payment plan is in place and the person adheres to its terms, and shall be waived once the payment plan is completed.

(II) Once the payment plan is in place and the person adheres to its terms, an itemization of unpaid parking penalties and service fees as described in subparagraph (A) shall not be filed with the department.

(III) Each California State University and community college district campus shall post the parking citation payment policy on its internet website for students’ awareness and access.

(ii) A California State University or community college district governing board that fails to implement a parking citation payment plan pursuant to clause (i) shall implement the payment plan as provided in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and subdivision (c).

(2) (A) If more than four hundred dollars ($400) in unpaid penalties and fees have
 been accrued by a person or registered owner, proof thereof may be filed with the court and shall have the same effect as a civil judgment. Execution may be levied and other measures may be taken for the collection of the judgment as are authorized for the collection of an unpaid civil judgment entered against a defendant in an action on a debtor. The court may assess costs against a judgment debtor to be paid upon satisfaction of the judgment. The processing agency shall send a notice by first-class mail to the person or registered owner indicating that a judgment shall be entered for the unpaid penalties, fees, and costs and that, after 21 calendar days from the date of the mailing of the notice, the judgment shall have the same effect as an entry of judgment against a judgment debtor. The person or registered owner shall also be notified at that time that execution may be levied against their assets, liens may be placed against their property, their wages may be garnished, and other steps may be taken to
 satisfy the judgment. If a judgment is rendered for the processing agency, the processing agency may contract with a collection agency to collect the amount of the judgment.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the processing agency shall pay the established first paper civil filing fee at the time an entry of civil judgment is requested.

(3) If the registration of the vehicle has not been renewed for 60 days beyond the renewal date, and the citation has not been collected by the department pursuant to Section 4760, file proof of unpaid penalties and fees with the court with the same effect as a civil judgment as provided in paragraph (2).

(b) This section does not apply to a registered owner of a vehicle if the citation was issued prior to the registered owner taking possession of the vehicle, and the department has
 notified the processing agency pursuant to Section 4764.

(c) (1) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a person is “indigent” if any of the following conditions is met:

(A) The person meets the income criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(B) The person receives public benefits from a program listed in subdivision (a) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(2) The person may demonstrate that the person is indigent by providing either of the following information, as applicable:

(A) Proof of income from a pay stub or another form of proof of earnings, such as a bank statement, that shows that the person meets the
 income criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 68632 of the Government Code, subject to review and approval by the processing agency or its designee. The processing agency or its designee shall not unreasonably withhold its approval.

(B) Proof of receipt of benefits under the programs described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, an electronic benefits transfer card or another card, subject to review and approval by the processing agency. The processing agency or its designee shall not unreasonably withhold its approval.

(3) If a defendant’s indigent status is found to have been willfully fraudulent, the defendant’s penalties and fees reduction shall be overturned and the full amount of penalties and fees shall be restored.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 346, Sec. 2.   (AB 1299)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

40220.5.

(a) (1) A processing agency may only use the process set forth in Section 4760 to collect unpaid parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees, if the processing agency provides indigent persons with the payment plan program described in this section.

(2) A processing agency shall not be required to comply with this section to collect unpaid parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees, pursuant to the process set forth in Section 4760 for a person who does not file an
 application for an indigency determination, a person who falls out of compliance with a payment plan, except as set forth in subdivision (d), or a person who the processing agency has determined is not an indigent person.

(b) A processing agency shall provide notice on its internet website of a person’s ability to request an indigency determination to qualify for a payment plan pursuant to this section. The notice shall include all of the following information:

(1) The availability of a payment plan for indigent persons to pay parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees.

(2) Clear language about how a person can request an indigency determination and what that
 determination will entail.

(3) Documents needed by the processing agency to make an indigency determination.

(c) A processing agency shall provide an indigent person an opportunity to pay unpaid parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees, pursuant to a payment plan that, at a minimum, does all of the following:

(1) Allows payment of unpaid parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees, in monthly installments of no more than twenty-five dollars ($25) for total amounts due that are three hundred dollars ($300) or less. The amount of late fees and penalty assessments waived pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be counted in calculating that
 total amount of three hundred dollars ($300) or less. Unpaid parking penalties and related service fees shall be paid off within 18 months. There shall be no prepayment penalty for paying off the balance prior to the payment period expiring.

(2) Waives all late fees and penalty assessments, exclusive of any state surcharges described in Sections 70372, 76000, and 76000.3 of the Government Code. Waived late fees and penalty assessments may be reinstated if the indigent person falls out of compliance with the payment plan.

(3) Limits the processing fee to participate in a payment plan to five dollars ($5) or less. The processing fee may be added to the payment plan amount, at the discretion of the indigent person.

(d) A
 processing agency shall allow an indigent person who falls out of compliance with the payment plan a one-time extension of 45 calendar days from the date the payment plan became delinquent to resume payment.

(e) A processing agency shall rescind the collection of unpaid parking penalties that were issued before July 1, 2018, and related service fees, with the department pursuant to the process set forth in Section 4760 for an indigent person, if the indigent person enrolls in a payment plan pursuant to this section.

(f) “Indigent” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 40220.

(g) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   (AB 833)   Effective October 3, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40221.

The processing agency shall not file a civil judgment with the court relating to a parking violation which has been filed with the department unless the processing agency has determined that the registration of the vehicle has not been renewed for 60 days beyond the renewal date and the citation has not been collected by the department pursuant to Section 4760.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1244, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1244.)
-------------------------------------------

40222.

The processing agency shall terminate proceedings on a notice of a delinquent parking violation or violations in all of the following cases:

(a) Upon receipt of collected penalties and administrative fees remitted by the department under Section 4762 for that notice of delinquent parking violation or violations. The termination under this subdivision is by satisfaction of the parking penalty or penalties.

(b) If the notice of a delinquent parking violation or violations was returned to the processing agency pursuant to Section 4764 and five years have elapsed since the date of the last violation. The termination under this subdivision is by the running of a statute of limitation of proceedings.

(c) The processing agency receives information, that it shall verify with the department, that the penalty or penalties have been paid to the department pursuant to Section 4762.

(d) (1) If the registered owner of the vehicle provides proof to the processing agency that he or she was not the registered owner on the date of the violation.

(2) This subdivision does not limit or impair the ability or the right of the processing agency to pursue the collection of a delinquent parking violation or violations from the person who was the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle on the date of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 741, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40224.

The time limitation provided by law for commencement of a civil action for a violation specified in Section 40200 shall be tolled from and after the date a notice of delinquent parking violation is filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40220 until the notice is returned to the processing agency under subdivision (b) of Section 4760 or Section 4762 or 4764 or is recalled by the processing agency pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 40211.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 734, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40225.

(a) An equipment violation entered on the notice of parking violation attached to the vehicle under Section 40203 shall be processed in accordance with this article. All of the violations entered on the notice of parking violation shall be noticed in the notice of delinquent parking violation delivered pursuant to Section 40206, together with the amount of civil penalty.

(b) (1) Whether or not a vehicle is in violation of any regulation governing the standing or parking of a vehicle but is in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 5204, a person authorized to enforce parking laws and regulations shall verify, using available Department
 of Motor Vehicle records, that no current registration exists for that vehicle. A citation shall not be issued for failure to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 5204 against any vehicle that has a current registration on file with the department. If the person authorized to enforce parking laws and regulations does not have immediate access to those records, a citation shall not be issued for failure to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 5204. A person authorized to enforce parking laws and regulations shall issue a written notice of parking violation for a vehicle that does not have a tab or a verified current registration, setting forth the alleged violation. The violation shall be processed pursuant to this section.

(2) Commencing on July 1, 2024, a violation of paragraph (1) shall not be the basis for any enforcement action before
 the second month after the month of expiration of the vehicle’s registration. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(c) The civil penalty for each equipment violation, including failure to properly display a license plate, is the amount established for the violation in the Uniform Bail and Penalty Schedule, as adopted by the Judicial Council, except that upon proof of the correction to the processing agency, the penalty shall be reduced to ten dollars ($10). The reduction provided for in this subdivision involving failure to properly display license plates shall only apply if, at the time of the violation, valid license plates were issued for that vehicle in accordance with this code. The civil penalty for each violation of Section 5204 is the amount established for the violation in the Uniform Bail and Penalty Schedule,
 as adopted by the Judicial Council, except that upon proof of the correction to the processing agency, the penalty shall be reduced to ten dollars ($10).

(d) Fifty percent of any penalty collected pursuant to this section for registration or equipment violations by a processing agency shall be paid to the county for remittance to the State Treasurer and the remaining 50 percent shall be retained by the issuing agency and processing agency subject to the terms of the contract described in Section 40200.5.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not preclude the recording of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 4000 on a notice of parking violation or the adjudication of that violation under the civil process set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   (AB 256)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

40226.

An issuing agency may, in lieu of collecting a fine for a citation for failure to display a disabled placard, charge an administrative fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) to process cancellation of a citation in any case where the individual who received the citation can show proof that he or she had been issued a valid placard at the time the citation was received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 640, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40230.

(a) Within 30 calendar days after the mailing or personal delivery of the final decision described in subdivision (b) of Section 40215, the contestant may seek review by filing an appeal to be heard by the superior court where the same shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the processing agency’s file in the case shall be received in evidence. A copy of the notice of parking violation or, if the citation was issued electronically, a true and correct abstract containing the information set forth in the notice of parking violation shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served in person or by first-class mail upon the processing agency by the contestant. For purposes of computing the 30-calendar-day period, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable. A proceeding under this subdivision is a limited civil case.

(b) The fee for filing the notice of appeal is as provided in Section 70615 of the Government Code. The court shall request that the processing agency’s file on the case be forwarded to the court, to be received within 15 calendar days of the request. The court shall notify the contestant of the appearance date by mail or personal delivery. The court shall retain the fee under Section 70615 of the Government Code regardless of the outcome of the appeal. If the court finds in favor of the contestant, the amount of the fee shall be reimbursed to the contestant by the processing agency. Any deposit of parking penalty shall be refunded by the processing agency in accordance with the judgment of the court.

(c) The conduct of the appeal under this section is a subordinate judicial duty that may be performed by traffic trial commissioners and other subordinate judicial officials at the direction of the presiding judge of the court.

(d) If no notice of appeal of the processing agency’s decision is filed within the period set forth in subdivision (a), the decision shall be deemed final.

(e) If the parking penalty has not been deposited and the decision is against the contestant, the processing agency shall, after the decision becomes final, proceed to collect the penalty pursuant to Section 40220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 738, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Procedure on Video Imaging of Parking Violations Occurring in Transit-Only Lanes [40240. - 40241.]

40240.

(a) A public transit operator, as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, may install automated forward facing parking control devices on city-owned or district-owned public transit vehicles, as defined by Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code, for the purpose of video imaging of parking violations occurring in transit-only traffic lanes and at transit stops. Citations shall be issued only for violations captured during the posted hours of operation for a transit-only traffic lane or during the scheduled operating hours at transit stops. The devices shall be angled and focused so as to capture video images of parking violations and not unnecessarily capture identifying images of other drivers, vehicles, and pedestrians. The
 devices shall record the date and time of the violation at the same time as the video images are captured. Transit agencies may share the relevant data, video, and images of parking violations collected by automated forward facing parking control devices with the local parking enforcement entity and local agency in the jurisdiction where the violation occurred. A transit operator, including the City and County of San Francisco and the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District, may only install forward facing cameras pursuant to this section if the examiner or issuing agency, as described in Section 40215, includes options to reduce or waive the payment of a parking penalty if the examiner or issuing agency determines that the person is an indigent person as defined in Section 40220.

(b) Prior to issuing notices of parking violations pursuant to subdivision
 (a) of Section 40241, a public transit operator, in partnership with a city, county, city and county, or local enforcement authority, shall commence a program to issue only
 warning notices for 60 days and shall also make a public announcement of the program and provide the public with information about the enforcement program, existing parking regulations, and the payment options available for low-income persons at least 60 days prior to commencement of issuing notices of parking violations.

(c) A designated employee of a city, county, city and county, or a contracted law enforcement agency for a special transit district, who is qualified by a city, county, city and county, or district to issue parking citations, shall review video image recordings for the purpose of determining whether a parking violation occurred in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop. A violation of a statute, regulation, or ordinance governing vehicle parking under this code, under a federal or state statute or
 regulation, or under an ordinance enacted by a city, county, city and county, or special transit district occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop observed by the designated employee in the recordings is subject to a civil penalty.

(d) The registered owner shall be permitted to review the video image evidence of the alleged violation during normal business hours at no cost.

(e) (1) Except as it may be included in court records described in Section 68152 of the Government Code, or as provided in paragraph (2), the video image evidence may be retained for up to six months from the date the information was first obtained, or 60 days after final disposition of the citation, whichever date is later, after which time the information shall be
 destroyed.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 26202.6 of the Government Code, video image evidence from forward facing automated enforcement devices that does not contain evidence of a parking violation occurring in a transit-only traffic lane or at a transit stop shall be destroyed within 15 days after the information was first obtained. Video image data and records collected pursuant to this section shall not be used or processed by an automated license plate recognition system, as defined in Section 1798.90.5 of the Civil Code, unless the public transit operator, city, county, city and county, or local enforcement authority meets the requirements in this paragraph and paragraph (1), the requirements of subdivision (f), and the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 40241.

(f) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or any other law, the video image records are confidential. Public agencies shall use and allow access to these records only for the purposes authorized by this article.

(g) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this article:

(1) “Local agency” means a public transit operator as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code or a local city, county, or city and county parking enforcement authority.

(2) “Transit-only traffic lane” means any designated transit-only lane on which use is restricted to mass
 transit vehicles, or other designated vehicles including taxis and vanpools, during posted times.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.
